Illinois, session 104th, HB3694.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Sections 3-12, 5-1, 5-3, and 6-4 and by adding 6Sections 1-3.47, 1-3.48, and 6-29.05 as follows: 7    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.47 new)8    Sec. 1-3.47. Class 3 craft distiller. "Class 3 craft 9distiller" means a person who is a holder of a distiller 10license, class 1 craft distiller license, class 2 craft 11distiller license, or a non-resident dealer license who 12manufactures no more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year 13in the aggregate and who may make sales to importing 14distributors, distributors, and retail licensees in accordance 15with the conditions set forth in paragraph (21) of subsection 16(a) of Section 3-12. 17    (235 ILCS 5/1-3.48 new)18    Sec. 1-3.48. Spirits showcase permit. "Spirits showcase 19permit" means a license for use by a class 1 craft distiller, 20class 2 craft distiller, class 3 craft distiller, or 21distributor to allow for the transfer of spirits only from an 22existing licensed premises of a class 1 craft distiller, class   HB3694- 2 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b12 craft distiller, class 3 craft distiller, or distributor to 2a designated site for a specific event. 3    (235 ILCS 5/3-12)4    Sec. 3-12. Powers and duties of State Commission. 5    (a) The State Commission shall have the following powers, 6functions, and duties: 7        (1) To receive applications and to issue licenses to 8    manufacturers, foreign importers, importing distributors, 9    distributors, non-resident dealers, on premise consumption 10    retailers, off premise sale retailers, special event 11    retailer licensees, special use permit licenses, auction 12    liquor licenses, brew pubs, caterer retailers, 13    non-beverage users, railroads, including owners and 14    lessees of sleeping, dining and cafe cars, airplanes, 15    boats, brokers, and wine maker's premises licensees in 16    accordance with the provisions of this Act, and to suspend 17    or revoke such licenses upon the State Commission's 18    determination, upon notice after hearing, that a licensee 19    has violated any provision of this Act or any rule or 20    regulation issued pursuant thereto and in effect for 30 21    days prior to such violation. Except in the case of an 22    action taken pursuant to a violation of Section 6-3, 6-5, 23    or 6-9, any action by the State Commission to suspend or 24    revoke a licensee's license may be limited to the license 25    for the specific premises where the violation occurred. An   HB3694- 3 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    action for a violation of this Act shall be commenced by 2    the State Commission within 2 years after the date the 3    State Commission becomes aware of the violation. 4        In lieu of suspending or revoking a license, the 5    commission may impose a fine, upon the State Commission's 6    determination and notice after hearing, that a licensee 7    has violated any provision of this Act or any rule or 8    regulation issued pursuant thereto and in effect for 30 9    days prior to such violation.10        For the purpose of this paragraph (1), when 11    determining multiple violations for the sale of alcohol to 12    a person under the age of 21, a second or subsequent 13    violation for the sale of alcohol to a person under the age 14    of 21 shall only be considered if it was committed within 5 15    years after the date when a prior violation for the sale of 16    alcohol to a person under the age of 21 was committed. 17        The fine imposed under this paragraph may not exceed 18    $500 for each violation. Each day that the activity, which 19    gave rise to the original fine, continues is a separate 20    violation. The maximum fine that may be levied against any 21    licensee, for the period of the license, shall not exceed 22    $20,000. The maximum penalty that may be imposed on a 23    licensee for selling a bottle of alcoholic liquor with a 24    foreign object in it or serving from a bottle of alcoholic 25    liquor with a foreign object in it shall be the 26    destruction of that bottle of alcoholic liquor for the   HB3694- 4 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    first 10 bottles so sold or served from by the licensee. 2    For the eleventh bottle of alcoholic liquor and for each 3    third bottle thereafter sold or served from by the 4    licensee with a foreign object in it, the maximum penalty 5    that may be imposed on the licensee is the destruction of 6    the bottle of alcoholic liquor and a fine of up to $50. 7        Any notice issued by the State Commission to a 8    licensee for a violation of this Act or any notice with 9    respect to settlement or offer in compromise shall include 10    the field report, photographs, and any other supporting 11    documentation necessary to reasonably inform the licensee 12    of the nature and extent of the violation or the conduct 13    alleged to have occurred. The failure to include such 14    required documentation shall result in the dismissal of 15    the action.16        (2) To adopt such rules and regulations consistent 17    with the provisions of this Act which shall be necessary 18    to carry on its functions and duties to the end that the 19    health, safety and welfare of the People of the State of 20    Illinois shall be protected and temperance in the 21    consumption of alcoholic liquors shall be fostered and 22    promoted and to distribute copies of such rules and 23    regulations to all licensees affected thereby. 24        (3) To call upon other administrative departments of 25    the State, county and municipal governments, county and 26    city police departments and upon prosecuting officers for   HB3694- 5 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    such information and assistance as it deems necessary in 2    the performance of its duties. 3        (4) To recommend to local commissioners rules and 4    regulations, not inconsistent with the law, for the 5    distribution and sale of alcoholic liquors throughout the 6    State. 7        (5) To inspect, or cause to be inspected, any premises 8    in this State where alcoholic liquors are manufactured, 9    distributed, warehoused, or sold. Nothing in this Act 10    authorizes an agent of the State Commission to inspect 11    private areas within the premises without reasonable 12    suspicion or a warrant during an inspection. "Private 13    areas" include, but are not limited to, safes, personal 14    property, and closed desks. 15        (5.1) Upon receipt of a complaint or upon having 16    knowledge that any person is engaged in business as a 17    manufacturer, importing distributor, distributor, or 18    retailer without a license or valid license, to conduct an 19    investigation. If, after conducting an investigation, the 20    State Commission is satisfied that the alleged conduct 21    occurred or is occurring, it may issue a cease and desist 22    notice as provided in this Act, impose civil penalties as 23    provided in this Act, notify the local liquor authority, 24    or file a complaint with the State's Attorney's Office of 25    the county where the incident occurred or the Attorney 26    General.   HB3694- 6 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1        (5.2) Upon receipt of a complaint or upon having 2    knowledge that any person is shipping alcoholic liquor 3    into this State from a point outside of this State if the 4    shipment is in violation of this Act, to conduct an 5    investigation. If, after conducting an investigation, the 6    State Commission is satisfied that the alleged conduct 7    occurred or is occurring, it may issue a cease and desist 8    notice as provided in this Act, impose civil penalties as 9    provided in this Act, notify the foreign jurisdiction, or 10    file a complaint with the State's Attorney's Office of the 11    county where the incident occurred or the Attorney 12    General. 13        (5.3) To receive complaints from licensees, local 14    officials, law enforcement agencies, organizations, and 15    persons stating that any licensee has been or is violating 16    any provision of this Act or the rules and regulations 17    issued pursuant to this Act. Such complaints shall be in 18    writing, signed and sworn to by the person making the 19    complaint, and shall state with specificity the facts in 20    relation to the alleged violation. If the State Commission 21    has reasonable grounds to believe that the complaint 22    substantially alleges a violation of this Act or rules and 23    regulations adopted pursuant to this Act, it shall conduct 24    an investigation. If, after conducting an investigation, 25    the State Commission is satisfied that the alleged 26    violation did occur, it shall proceed with disciplinary   HB3694- 7 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    action against the licensee as provided in this Act. 2        (5.4) To make arrests and issue notices of civil 3    violations where necessary for the enforcement of this 4    Act. 5        (5.5) To investigate any and all unlicensed activity. 6        (5.6) To impose civil penalties or fines to any person 7    who, without holding a valid license, engages in conduct 8    that requires a license pursuant to this Act, in an amount 9    not to exceed $20,000 for each offense as determined by 10    the State Commission. A civil penalty shall be assessed by 11    the State Commission after a hearing is held in accordance 12    with the provisions set forth in this Act regarding the 13    provision of a hearing for the revocation or suspension of 14    a license. 15        (6) To hear and determine appeals from orders of a 16    local commission in accordance with the provisions of this 17    Act, as hereinafter set forth. Hearings under this 18    subsection shall be held in Springfield or Chicago, at 19    whichever location is the more convenient for the majority 20    of persons who are parties to the hearing. 21        (7) The State Commission shall establish uniform 22    systems of accounts to be kept by all retail licensees 23    having more than 4 employees, and for this purpose the 24    State Commission may classify all retail licensees having 25    more than 4 employees and establish a uniform system of 26    accounts for each class and prescribe the manner in which   HB3694- 8 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    such accounts shall be kept. The State Commission may also 2    prescribe the forms of accounts to be kept by all retail 3    licensees having more than 4 employees, including, but not 4    limited to, accounts of earnings and expenses and any 5    distribution, payment, or other distribution of earnings 6    or assets, and any other forms, records, and memoranda 7    which in the judgment of the commission may be necessary 8    or appropriate to carry out any of the provisions of this 9    Act, including, but not limited to, such forms, records, 10    and memoranda as will readily and accurately disclose at 11    all times the beneficial ownership of such retail licensed 12    business. The accounts, forms, records, and memoranda 13    shall be available at all reasonable times for inspection 14    by authorized representatives of the State Commission or 15    by any local liquor control commissioner or his or her 16    authorized representative. The commission may, from time 17    to time, alter, amend, or repeal, in whole or in part, any 18    uniform system of accounts, or the form and manner of 19    keeping accounts. 20        (8) In the conduct of any hearing authorized to be 21    held by the State Commission, to appoint, at the 22    commission's discretion, hearing officers to conduct 23    hearings involving complex issues or issues that will 24    require a protracted period of time to resolve, to 25    examine, or cause to be examined, under oath, any 26    licensee, and to examine or cause to be examined the books   HB3694- 9 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    and records of such licensee; to hear testimony and take 2    proof material for its information in the discharge of its 3    duties hereunder; to administer or cause to be 4    administered oaths; for any such purpose to issue subpoena 5    or subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses and 6    the production of books, which shall be effective in any 7    part of this State, and to adopt rules to implement its 8    powers under this paragraph (8). 9        Any circuit court may, by order duly entered, require 10    the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant 11    books subpoenaed by the State Commission and the court may 12    compel obedience to its order by proceedings for contempt. 13        (9) To investigate the administration of laws in 14    relation to alcoholic liquors in this and other states and 15    any foreign countries, and to recommend from time to time 16    to the Governor and through him or her to the legislature 17    of this State, such amendments to this Act, if any, as it 18    may think desirable and as will serve to further the 19    general broad purposes contained in Section 1-2 hereof. 20        (10) To adopt such rules and regulations consistent 21    with the provisions of this Act which shall be necessary 22    for the control, sale, or disposition of alcoholic liquor 23    damaged as a result of an accident, wreck, flood, fire, or 24    other similar occurrence. 25        (11) To develop industry educational programs related 26    to responsible serving and selling, particularly in the   HB3694- 10 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    areas of overserving consumers and illegal underage 2    purchasing and consumption of alcoholic beverages. 3        (11.1) To license persons providing education and 4    training to alcohol beverage sellers and servers for 5    mandatory and non-mandatory training under the Beverage 6    Alcohol Sellers and Servers Education and Training 7    (BASSET) programs and to develop and administer a public 8    awareness program in Illinois to reduce or eliminate the 9    illegal purchase and consumption of alcoholic beverage 10    products by persons under the age of 21. Application for a 11    license shall be made on forms provided by the State 12    Commission. 13        (12) To develop and maintain a repository of license 14    and regulatory information. 15        (13) (Blank).16        (14) On or before April 30, 2008 and every 2 years 17    thereafter, the State Commission shall present a written 18    report to the Governor and the General Assembly that shall 19    be based on a study of the impact of Public Act 95-634 on 20    the business of soliciting, selling, and shipping wine 21    from inside and outside of this State directly to 22    residents of this State. As part of its report, the State 23    Commission shall provide all of the following information:24            (A) The amount of State excise and sales tax 25        revenues generated.26            (B) The amount of licensing fees received.  HB3694- 11 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1            (C) The number of cases of wine shipped from 2        inside and outside of this State directly to residents 3        of this State.4            (D) The number of alcohol compliance operations 5        conducted.6            (E) The number of winery shipper's licenses 7        issued.8            (F) The number of each of the following: reported 9        violations; cease and desist notices issued by the 10        Commission; notices of violations issued by the 11        Commission and to the Department of Revenue; and 12        notices and complaints of violations to law 13        enforcement officials, including, without limitation, 14        the Illinois Attorney General and the U.S. Department 15        of Treasury's Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade 16        Bureau.17        (15) As a means to reduce the underage consumption of 18    alcoholic liquors, the State Commission shall conduct 19    alcohol compliance operations to investigate whether 20    businesses that are soliciting, selling, and shipping wine 21    from inside or outside of this State directly to residents 22    of this State are licensed by this State or are selling or 23    attempting to sell wine to persons under 21 years of age in 24    violation of this Act.25        (16) The State Commission shall, in addition to 26    notifying any appropriate law enforcement agency, submit   HB3694- 12 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    notices of complaints or violations of Sections 6-29, 2    6-29.05, and 6-29.1 by persons who do not hold a winery 3    shipper's license or distillery shipper's license under 4    this Act to the Illinois Attorney General and to the U.S. 5    Department of Treasury's Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade 6    Bureau.7        (17)(A) A person licensed to make wine under the laws 8    of another state who has a winery shipper's license under 9    this Act and annually produces less than 25,000 gallons of 10    wine or a person who has a first-class or second-class 11    wine manufacturer's license, a first-class or second-class 12    wine-maker's license, or a limited wine manufacturer's 13    license under this Act and annually produces less than 14    25,000 gallons of wine may make application to the 15    Commission for a self-distribution exemption to allow the 16    sale of not more than 5,000 gallons of the exemption 17    holder's wine to retail licensees per year and to sell 18    cider, mead, or both cider and mead to brewers, class 1 19    brewers, class 2 brewers, and class 3 brewers, and class 3 20    craft distillers that, pursuant to subsection (e) of 21    Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, spirits, mead, 22    or any combination thereof to non-licensees at their 23    breweries or distilleries.24        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 25    penalty of perjury, such person shall state (1) the date 26    it was established; (2) its volume of production and sales   HB3694- 13 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    for each year since its establishment; (3) its efforts to 2    establish distributor relationships; (4) that a 3    self-distribution exemption is necessary to facilitate the 4    marketing of its wine; and (5) that it will comply with the 5    liquor and revenue laws of the United States, this State, 6    and any other state where it is licensed.7        (C) The State Commission shall approve the application 8    for a self-distribution exemption if such person: (1) is 9    in compliance with State revenue and liquor laws; (2) is 10    not a member of any affiliated group that produces 11    directly or indirectly more than 25,000 gallons of wine 12    per annum, 930,000 gallons of beer per annum, or 50,000 13    gallons of spirits per annum; (3) will not annually 14    produce for sale more than 25,000 gallons of wine, 930,000 15    gallons of beer, or 50,000 gallons of spirits; and (4) 16    will not annually sell more than 5,000 gallons of its wine 17    to retail licensees.18        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 19    annually certify to the State Commission its production of 20    wine in the previous 12 months and its anticipated 21    production and sales for the next 12 months. The State 22    Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a 23    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 24    that the exemption holder has made a material 25    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 26    or liquor law of Illinois, exceeded production of 25,000   HB3694- 14 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    gallons of wine, 930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 2    gallons of spirits in any calendar year, or become part of 3    an affiliated group producing more than 25,000 gallons of 4    wine, 930,000 gallons of beer, or 50,000 gallons of 5    spirits.6        (E) Except in hearings for violations of this Act or 7    Public Act 95-634 or a bona fide investigation by duly 8    sworn law enforcement officials, the State Commission, or 9    its agents, the State Commission shall maintain the 10    production and sales information of a self-distribution 11    exemption holder as confidential and shall not release 12    such information to any person.13        (F) The State Commission shall issue regulations 14    governing self-distribution exemptions consistent with 15    this Section and this Act.16        (G) Nothing in this paragraph (17) shall prohibit a 17    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 18    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 19    licensed Illinois distributor.20        (H) It is the intent of this paragraph (17) to promote 21    and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds 22    that, in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 23    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 24    exception for smaller makers of wine as their wines are 25    frequently adjusted in varietals, mixes, vintages, and 26    taste to find and create market niches sometimes too small   HB3694- 15 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    for distributor or importing distributor business 2    strategies. Limited self-distribution rights will afford 3    and allow smaller makers of wine access to the marketplace 4    in order to develop a customer base without impairing the 5    integrity of the 3-tier system. 6        (18)(A) A class 1 brewer licensee, who must also be 7    either a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer 8    and annually manufacture less than 930,000 gallons of 9    beer, may make application to the State Commission for a 10    self-distribution exemption to allow the sale of not more 11    than 232,500 gallons per year of the exemption holder's 12    beer to retail licensees and to brewers, class 1 brewers, 13    and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to subsection (e) of 14    Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, mead, or any 15    combination thereof to non-licensees at their breweries.16        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 17    penalty of perjury, the class 1 brewer licensee shall 18    state (1) the date it was established; (2) its volume of 19    beer manufactured and sold for each year since its 20    establishment; (3) its efforts to establish distributor 21    relationships; (4) that a self-distribution exemption is 22    necessary to facilitate the marketing of its beer; and (5) 23    that it will comply with the alcoholic beverage and 24    revenue laws of the United States, this State, and any 25    other state where it is licensed.26        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the   HB3694- 16 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    State Commission's website at least 45 days prior to 2    action by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 3    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 4    if the class 1 brewer licensee: (1) is in compliance with 5    the State, revenue, and alcoholic beverage laws; (2) is 6    not a member of any affiliated group that manufactures, 7    directly or indirectly, more than 930,000 gallons of beer 8    per annum, 25,000 gallons of wine per annum, or 50,000 9    gallons of spirits per annum; (3) shall not annually 10    manufacture for sale more than 930,000 gallons of beer, 11    25,000 gallons of wine, or 50,000 gallons of spirits; (4) 12    shall not annually sell more than 232,500 gallons of its 13    beer to retail licensees and class 3 brewers and to 14    brewers, class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, 15    pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, 16    sell beer, cider, mead, or any combination thereof to 17    non-licensees at their breweries; and (5) has relinquished 18    any brew pub license held by the licensee, including any 19    ownership interest it held in the licensed brew pub.20        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 21    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 22    of beer during the previous 12 months and its anticipated 23    manufacture and sales of beer for the next 12 months. The 24    State Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a 25    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 26    that the exemption holder has made a material   HB3694- 17 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 2    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 3    manufacture of 930,000 gallons of beer, 25,000 gallons of 4    wine, or 50,000 gallons of spirits in any calendar year or 5    became part of an affiliated group manufacturing more than 6    930,000 gallons of beer, 25,000 gallons of wine, or 50,000 7    gallons of spirits.8        (E) The State Commission shall issue rules and 9    regulations governing self-distribution exemptions 10    consistent with this Act.11        (F) Nothing in this paragraph (18) shall prohibit a 12    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 13    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 14    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor. 15    If a self-distribution exemption holder enters into a 16    distribution agreement and has assigned distribution 17    rights to an importing distributor or distributor, then 18    the self-distribution exemption holder's distribution 19    rights in the assigned territories shall cease in a 20    reasonable time not to exceed 60 days.21        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph (18) to promote 22    and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds 23    that in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 24    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 25    exception for smaller manufacturers in order to afford and 26    allow such smaller manufacturers of beer access to the   HB3694- 18 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    marketplace in order to develop a customer base without 2    impairing the integrity of the 3-tier system. 3        (19)(A) A class 1 craft distiller licensee or a 4    non-resident dealer who manufactures less than 50,000 5    gallons of distilled spirits per year may make application 6    to the State Commission for a self-distribution exemption 7    to allow the sale of not more than 5,000 gallons of the 8    exemption holder's spirits to retail licensees per year. 9        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 10    penalty of perjury, the class 1 craft distiller licensee 11    or non-resident dealer shall state (1) the date it was 12    established; (2) its volume of spirits manufactured and 13    sold for each year since its establishment; (3) its 14    efforts to establish distributor relationships; (4) that a 15    self-distribution exemption is necessary to facilitate the 16    marketing of its spirits; and (5) that it will comply with 17    the alcoholic beverage and revenue laws of the United 18    States, this State, and any other state where it is 19    licensed. 20        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the 21    State Commission's website at least 45 days prior to 22    action by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 23    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 24    if the applicant: (1) is in compliance with State revenue 25    and alcoholic beverage laws; (2) is not a member of any 26    affiliated group that produces more than 50,000 gallons of   HB3694- 19 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    spirits per annum, 930,000 gallons of beer per annum, or 2    25,000 gallons of wine per annum; (3) does not annually 3    manufacture for sale more than 50,000 gallons of spirits, 4    930,000 gallons of beer, or 25,000 gallons of wine; and 5    (4) does not annually sell more than 5,000 gallons of its 6    spirits to retail licensees. 7        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 8    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 9    of spirits during the previous 12 months and its 10    anticipated manufacture and sales of spirits for the next 11    12 months. The State Commission may fine, suspend, or 12    revoke a self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it 13    finds that the exemption holder has made a material 14    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 15    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 16    manufacture of 50,000 gallons of spirits, 930,000 gallons 17    of beer, or 25,000 gallons of wine in any calendar year, or 18    has become part of an affiliated group manufacturing more 19    than 50,000 gallons of spirits, 930,000 gallons of beer, 20    or 25,000 gallons of wine. 21        (E) The State Commission shall adopt rules governing 22    self-distribution exemptions consistent with this Act. 23        (F) Nothing in this paragraph (19) shall prohibit a 24    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 25    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 26    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor.   HB3694- 20 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph (19) to promote 2    and continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds 3    that in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory 4    distribution system, it is necessary to create an 5    exception for smaller manufacturers in order to afford and 6    allow such smaller manufacturers of spirits access to the 7    marketplace in order to develop a customer base without 8    impairing the integrity of the 3-tier system. 9        (20)(A) A class 3 brewer licensee who must manufacture 10    less than 465,000 gallons of beer in the aggregate and not 11    more than 155,000 gallons at any single brewery premises 12    may make application to the State Commission for a 13    self-distribution exemption to allow the sale of not more 14    than 6,200 gallons of beer from each in-state or 15    out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, which shall not 16    exceed 18,600 gallons annually in the aggregate, that is 17    manufactured at a wholly owned class 3 brewer's in-state 18    or out-of-state licensed premises to retail licensees and 19    class 3 brewers and to brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 20    brewers that, pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 6-4, 21    sell beer, cider, or both beer and cider to non-licensees 22    at their licensed breweries.23        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 24    penalty of perjury, the class 3 brewer licensee shall 25    state:26            (1) the date it was established;  HB3694- 21 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1            (2) its volume of beer manufactured and sold for 2        each year since its establishment;3            (3) its efforts to establish distributor 4        relationships;5            (4) that a self-distribution exemption is 6        necessary to facilitate the marketing of its beer; and7            (5) that it will comply with the alcoholic 8        beverage and revenue laws of the United States, this 9        State, and any other state where it is licensed.10        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the 11    State Commission's website at least 45 days before action 12    by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 13    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 14    if the class 3 brewer licensee: (1) is in compliance with 15    the State, revenue, and alcoholic beverage laws; (2) is 16    not a member of any affiliated group that manufacturers, 17    directly or indirectly, more than 465,000 gallons of beer 18    per annum; (3) shall not annually manufacture for sale 19    more than 465,000 gallons of beer or more than 155,000 20    gallons at any single brewery premises; and (4) shall not 21    annually sell more than 6,200 gallons of beer from each 22    in-state or out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, and 23    shall not exceed 18,600 gallons annually in the aggregate, 24    to retail licensees and class 3 brewers and to brewers, 25    class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to 26    subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer,   HB3694- 22 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    cider, or both beer and cider to non-licensees at their 2    breweries.3        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 4    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 5    of beer during the previous 12 months and its anticipated 6    manufacture and sales of beer for the next 12 months. The 7    State Commission may fine, suspend, or revoke a 8    self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it finds 9    that the exemption holder has made a material 10    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 11    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 12    manufacture of 465,000 gallons of beer in any calendar 13    year or became part of an affiliated group manufacturing 14    more than 465,000 gallons of beer, or exceeded the sale to 15    retail licensees, brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 16    brewers, and class 3 brewers of 6,200 gallons per brewery 17    location or 18,600 gallons in the aggregate.18        (E) The State Commission may adopt rules governing 19    self-distribution exemptions consistent with this Act.20        (F) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a 21    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 22    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 23    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor. 24    If a self-distribution exemption holder enters into a 25    distribution agreement and has assigned distribution 26    rights to an importing distributor or distributor, then   HB3694- 23 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    the self-distribution exemption holder's distribution 2    rights in the assigned territories shall cease in a 3    reasonable time not to exceed 60 days.4        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph to promote and 5    continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds that 6    in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory distribution 7    system, it is necessary to create an exception for smaller 8    manufacturers in order to afford and allow such smaller 9    manufacturers of beer access to the marketplace in order 10    to develop a customer base without impairing the integrity 11    of the 3-tier system. 12        (21)(A) A class 3 craft distiller licensee who 13    manufactures less than 100,000 gallons of spirits in the 14    aggregate may make application to the State Commission for 15    a self-distribution exemption to allow the sale of spirits 16    that are manufactured at a wholly owned class 3 craft 17    distiller's in-state or out-of-state licensed premises to 18    retail licensees and class 3 brewers and to class 3 craft 19    distillers that, pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 20    6-4, sell beer, cider, spirits, or any combination thereof 21    to non-licensees at their licensed distilleries.22        (B) In the application, which shall be sworn under 23    penalty of perjury, the class 3 craft distiller licensee 24    shall state: (1) the date it was established; (2) its 25    volume of spirits manufactured and sold for each year 26    since its establishment; (3) its efforts to establish   HB3694- 24 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    distributor relationships; (4) that a self-distribution 2    exemption is necessary to facilitate the marketing of its 3    spirits; and (5) that it will comply with the alcoholic 4    beverage and revenue laws of the United States, this 5    State, and any other state where it is licensed.6        (C) Any application submitted shall be posted on the 7    State Commission's website at least 45 days before action 8    by the State Commission. The State Commission shall 9    approve the application for a self-distribution exemption 10    if the class 3 craft distiller licensee: (1) is in 11    compliance with the State, revenue, and alcoholic beverage 12    laws; (2) is not a member of any affiliated group that 13    manufacturers, directly or indirectly, more than 100,000 14    gallons of spirits per annum; and (3) shall not annually 15    manufacture for sale more than 100,000 gallons of spirits.16        (D) A self-distribution exemption holder shall 17    annually certify to the State Commission its manufacture 18    of spirits during the previous 12 months and its 19    anticipated manufacture and sales of spirits for the next 20    12 months. The State Commission may fine, suspend, or 21    revoke a self-distribution exemption after a hearing if it 22    finds that the exemption holder has made a material 23    misrepresentation in its application, violated a revenue 24    or alcoholic beverage law of Illinois, exceeded the 25    manufacture of 100,000 gallons of spirits in any calendar 26    year, or became part of an affiliated group manufacturing   HB3694- 25 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    more than 100,000 gallons of spirits.2        (E) The State Commission may adopt rules governing 3    self-distribution exemptions consistent with this Act.4        (F) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a 5    self-distribution exemption holder from entering into or 6    simultaneously having a distribution agreement with a 7    licensed Illinois importing distributor or a distributor.8        (G) It is the intent of this paragraph to promote and 9    continue orderly markets. The General Assembly finds that 10    in order to preserve Illinois' regulatory distribution 11    system, it is necessary to create an exception for smaller 12    manufacturers in order to afford and allow such smaller 13    manufacturers of spirits access to the marketplace in 14    order to develop a customer base without impairing the 15    integrity of the 3-tier system. 16    (b) On or before April 30, 1999, the Commission shall 17present a written report to the Governor and the General 18Assembly that shall be based on a study of the impact of Public 19Act 90-739 on the business of soliciting, selling, and 20shipping alcoholic liquor from outside of this State directly 21to residents of this State. 22    As part of its report, the Commission shall provide the 23following information: 24        (i) the amount of State excise and sales tax revenues 25    generated as a result of Public Act 90-739; 26        (ii) the amount of licensing fees received as a result   HB3694- 26 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    of Public Act 90-739; 2        (iii) the number of reported violations, the number of 3    cease and desist notices issued by the Commission, the 4    number of notices of violations issued to the Department 5    of Revenue, and the number of notices and complaints of 6    violations to law enforcement officials. 7(Source: P.A. 101-37, eff. 7-3-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 8101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 98-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 10    (235 ILCS 5/5-1)  (from Ch. 43, par. 115)11    Sec. 5-1. Licenses issued by the Illinois Liquor Control 12Commission shall be of the following classes:13    (a) Manufacturer's license - Class 1. Distiller, Class 2. 14Rectifier, Class 3. Brewer, Class 4. First Class Wine 15Manufacturer, Class 5. Second Class Wine Manufacturer, Class 166. First Class Winemaker, Class 7. Second Class Winemaker, 17Class 8. Limited Wine Manufacturer, Class 9. Craft Distiller, 18Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller, Class 11. Class 2 Craft 19Distiller, Class 12. Class 1 Brewer, Class 13. Class 2 Brewer, 20Class 14. Class 3 Brewer, Class 15. Class 3 Craft Distiller, 21    (b) Distributor's license,22    (c) Importing Distributor's license,23    (d) Retailer's license,24    (e) Special Event Retailer's license (not-for-profit),25    (f) Railroad license,  HB3694- 27 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    (g) Boat license,2    (h) Non-Beverage User's license,3    (i) Wine-maker's premises license,4    (j) Airplane license,5    (k) Foreign importer's license,6    (l) Broker's license,7    (m) Non-resident dealer's license,8    (n) Brew Pub license,9    (o) Auction liquor license,10    (p) Caterer retailer license,11    (q) Special use permit license,12    (r) Winery shipper's license,13    (s) Craft distiller tasting permit,14    (t) Brewer warehouse permit, 15    (u) Distilling pub license, 16    (v) Craft distiller warehouse permit,17    (w) Beer showcase permit, . 18    (x) Distillery shipper's license,19    (y) Spirits showcase permit. 20    No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other legal 21business entity that is engaged in the manufacturing of wine 22may concurrently obtain and hold a wine-maker's license and a 23wine manufacturer's license.24    (a) A manufacturer's license shall allow the manufacture, 25importation in bulk, storage, distribution and sale of 26alcoholic liquor to persons without the State, as may be   HB3694- 28 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1permitted by law and to licensees in this State as follows:2    Class 1. A Distiller may make sales and deliveries of 3alcoholic liquor to distillers, rectifiers, importing 4distributors, distributors and non-beverage users and to no 5other licensees.6    Class 2. A Rectifier, who is not a distiller, as defined 7herein, may make sales and deliveries of alcoholic liquor to 8rectifiers, importing distributors, distributors, retailers 9and non-beverage users and to no other licensees.10    Class 3. A Brewer may make sales and deliveries of beer to 11importing distributors and distributors and may make sales as 12authorized under subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, 13including any alcoholic liquor that subsection (e) of Section 146-4 authorizes a brewer to sell in its original package only to 15a non-licensee for pick-up by a non-licensee either within the 16interior of the brewery premises or at outside of the brewery 17premises at a curb-side or parking lot adjacent to the brewery 18premises, subject to any local ordinance.19    Class 4. A first class wine-manufacturer may make sales 20and deliveries of up to 50,000 gallons of wine to 21manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors, and to 22no other licensees. If a first-class wine-manufacturer 23manufactures beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be 24eligible for, in addition to any current license, a class 1 25brewer license, shall not manufacture more than 930,000 26gallons of beer per year, and shall not be a member of or   HB3694- 29 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 2produces more than 930,000 gallons of beer per year. If the 3first-class wine-manufacturer manufactures spirits, it shall 4also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 5current license, a class 1 craft distiller license, shall not 6manufacture more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year, and 7shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 8indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 50,000 9gallons of spirits per year. A first-class wine-manufacturer 10shall be permitted to sell wine manufactured at the 11first-class wine-manufacturer premises to non-licensees. 12    Class 5. A second class Wine manufacturer may make sales 13and deliveries of more than 50,000 gallons of wine to 14manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors and to 15no other licensees.16    Class 6. A first-class wine-maker's license shall allow 17the manufacture of up to 50,000 gallons of wine per year, and 18the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in the State 19and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. A 20person who, prior to June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public 21Act 95-634), is a holder of a first-class wine-maker's license 22and annually produces more than 25,000 gallons of its own wine 23and who distributes its wine to licensed retailers shall cease 24this practice on or before July 1, 2008 in compliance with 25Public Act 95-634. If a first-class wine-maker manufactures 26beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in   HB3694- 30 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1addition to any current license, a class 1 brewer license, 2shall not manufacture more than 930,000 gallons of beer per 3year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly 4or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 5gallons of beer per year. If the first-class wine-maker 6manufactures spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be 7eligible for, in addition to any current license, a class 1 8craft distiller license, shall not manufacture more than 950,000 gallons of spirits per year, and shall not be a member 10of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 11that produces more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. A 12first-class wine-maker holding a class 1 brewer license or a 13class 1 craft distiller license shall not be eligible for a 14wine-maker's premises license but shall be permitted to sell 15wine manufactured at the first-class wine-maker premises to 16non-licensees. 17    Class 7. A second-class wine-maker's license shall allow 18the manufacture of up to 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and 19the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in this State 20and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. A 21person who, prior to June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public 22Act 95-634), is a holder of a second-class wine-maker's 23license and annually produces more than 25,000 gallons of its 24own wine and who distributes its wine to licensed retailers 25shall cease this practice on or before July 1, 2008 in 26compliance with Public Act 95-634. If a second-class   HB3694- 31 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1wine-maker manufactures beer, it shall also obtain and shall 2only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 3class 2 brewer license, shall not manufacture more than 43,720,000 gallons of beer per year, and shall not be a member 5of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 6that produces more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year. If 7a second-class wine-maker manufactures spirits, it shall also 8obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 9current license, a class 2 craft distiller license, shall not 10manufacture more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year, and 11shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 12indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 13gallons of spirits per year. 14    Class 8. A limited wine-manufacturer may make sales and 15deliveries not to exceed 40,000 gallons of wine per year to 16distributors, and to non-licensees in accordance with the 17provisions of this Act.18    Class 9. A craft distiller license, which may only be held 19by a class 1 craft distiller licensee or class 2 craft 20distiller licensee but not held by both a class 1 craft 21distiller licensee and a class 2 craft distiller licensee, 22shall grant all rights conveyed by either: (i) a class 1 craft 23distiller license if the craft distiller holds a class 1 craft 24distiller license; or (ii) a class 2 craft distiller licensee 25if the craft distiller holds a class 2 craft distiller 26license.   HB3694- 32 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    Class 10. A class 1 craft distiller license, which may 2only be issued to a licensed craft distiller or licensed 3non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture of up to 450,000 gallons of spirits per year provided that the class 1 5craft distiller licensee does not manufacture more than a 6combined 50,000 gallons of spirits per year and is not a member 7of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 8that produces more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. If 9a class 1 craft distiller manufactures beer, it shall also 10obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 11current license, a class 1 brewer license, shall not 12manufacture more than 930,000 gallons of beer per year, and 13shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 14indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 15gallons of beer per year. If a class 1 craft distiller 16manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall only be 17eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 18first-class wine-manufacturer license or a first-class 19wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 20gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a member of or 21affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 22produces more than 50,000 gallons of wine per year. A class 1 23craft distiller licensee may make sales and deliveries to 24importing distributors and distributors and to retail 25licensees in accordance with the conditions set forth in 26paragraph (19) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this Act.   HB3694- 33 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1However, the aggregate amount of spirits sold to non-licensees 2and sold or delivered to retail licensees may not exceed 5,000 3gallons per year.4    A class 1 craft distiller licensee may sell up to 5,000 5gallons of such spirits to non-licensees to the extent 6permitted by any exemption approved by the State Commission 7pursuant to Section 6-4 of this Act. A class 1 craft distiller 8license holder may store such spirits at a non-contiguous 9licensed location, but at no time shall a class 1 craft 10distiller license holder directly or indirectly produce in the 11aggregate more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. 12    A class 1 craft distiller licensee may hold more than one 13class 1 craft distiller's license. However, a class 1 craft 14distiller that holds more than one class 1 craft distiller 15license shall not manufacture, in the aggregate, more than 1650,000 gallons of spirits by distillation per year and shall 17not sell, in the aggregate, more than 5,000 gallons of such 18spirits to non-licensees in accordance with an exemption 19approved by the State Commission pursuant to Section 6-4 of 20this Act. 21    Class 11. A class 2 craft distiller license, which may 22only be issued to a licensed craft distiller or licensed 23non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture of up to 24100,000 gallons of spirits per year provided that the class 2 25craft distiller licensee does not manufacture more than a 26combined 100,000 gallons of spirits per year and is not a   HB3694- 34 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1member of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a 2manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 gallons of 3spirits per year. If a class 2 craft distiller manufactures 4beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in 5addition to any current license, a class 2 brewer license, 6shall not manufacture more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per 7year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly 8or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 93,720,000 gallons of beer per year. If a class 2 craft 10distiller manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall 11only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 12second-class wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more 13than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a 14member of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a 15manufacturer that produces more than 150,000 gallons of wine 16per year. A class 2 craft distiller licensee may make sales and 17deliveries to importing distributors and distributors, but 18shall not make sales or deliveries to any other licensee. If 19the State Commission provides prior approval, a class 2 craft 20distiller licensee may annually transfer up to 100,000 gallons 21of spirits manufactured by that class 2 craft distiller 22licensee to the premises of a licensed class 2 craft distiller 23wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. A class 2 craft 24distiller may transfer spirits to a distilling pub wholly 25owned and operated by the class 2 craft distiller subject to 26the following limitations and restrictions: (i) the transfer   HB3694- 35 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1shall not annually exceed more than 5,000 gallons; (ii) the 2annual amount transferred shall reduce the distilling pub's 3annual permitted production limit; (iii) all spirits 4transferred shall be subject to Article VIII of this Act; (iv) 5a written record shall be maintained by the distiller and 6distilling pub specifying the amount, date of delivery, and 7receipt of the product by the distilling pub; and (v) the 8distilling pub shall be located no farther than 80 miles from 9the class 2 craft distiller's licensed location. 10    A class 2 craft distiller shall, prior to transferring 11spirits to a distilling pub wholly owned by the class 2 craft 12distiller, furnish a written notice to the State Commission of 13intent to transfer spirits setting forth the name and address 14of the distilling pub and shall annually submit to the State 15Commission a verified report identifying the total gallons of 16spirits transferred to the distilling pub wholly owned by the 17class 2 craft distiller. 18    A class 2 craft distiller license holder may store such 19spirits at a non-contiguous licensed location, but at no time 20shall a class 2 craft distiller license holder directly or 21indirectly produce in the aggregate more than 100,000 gallons 22of spirits per year. 23    Class 12. A class 1 brewer license, which may only be 24issued to a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer, 25shall allow the manufacture of up to 930,000 gallons of beer 26per year provided that the class 1 brewer licensee does not   HB3694- 36 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1manufacture more than a combined 930,000 gallons of beer per 2year and is not a member of or affiliated with, directly or 3indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 4gallons of beer per year. If a class 1 brewer manufactures 5spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, 6in addition to any current license, a class 1 craft distiller 7license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 gallons of 8spirits per year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated 9with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces 10more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. If a class 1 11craft brewer manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall 12only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 13first-class wine-manufacturer license or a first-class 14wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 15gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a member of or 16affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 17produces more than 50,000 gallons of wine per year. A class 1 18brewer licensee may make sales and deliveries to importing 19distributors and distributors and to retail licensees in 20accordance with the conditions set forth in paragraph (18) of 21subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this Act. If the State 22Commission provides prior approval, a class 1 brewer may 23annually transfer up to 930,000 gallons of beer manufactured 24by that class 1 brewer to the premises of a licensed class 1 25brewer wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. 26    Class 13. A class 2 brewer license, which may only be   HB3694- 37 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1issued to a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer, 2shall allow the manufacture of up to 3,720,000 gallons of beer 3per year provided that the class 2 brewer licensee does not 4manufacture more than a combined 3,720,000 gallons of beer per 5year and is not a member of or affiliated with, directly or 6indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 3,720,000 7gallons of beer per year. If a class 2 brewer manufactures 8spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, 9in addition to any current license, a class 2 craft distiller 10license, shall not manufacture more than 100,000 gallons of 11spirits per year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated 12with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces 13more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year. If a class 2 14craft distiller manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and 15shall only be eligible for, in addition to any current 16license, a second-class wine-maker's license, shall not 17manufacture more than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and 18shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 19indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 150,000 20gallons of wine a year. A class 2 brewer licensee may make 21sales and deliveries to importing distributors and 22distributors, but shall not make sales or deliveries to any 23other licensee. If the State Commission provides prior 24approval, a class 2 brewer licensee may annually transfer up 25to 3,720,000 gallons of beer manufactured by that class 2 26brewer licensee to the premises of a licensed class 2 brewer   HB3694- 38 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1wholly owned and operated by the same licensee.2    A class 2 brewer may transfer beer to a brew pub wholly 3owned and operated by the class 2 brewer subject to the 4following limitations and restrictions: (i) the transfer shall 5not annually exceed more than 31,000 gallons; (ii) the annual 6amount transferred shall reduce the brew pub's annual 7permitted production limit; (iii) all beer transferred shall 8be subject to Article VIII of this Act; (iv) a written record 9shall be maintained by the brewer and brew pub specifying the 10amount, date of delivery, and receipt of the product by the 11brew pub; and (v) the brew pub shall be located no farther than 1280 miles from the class 2 brewer's licensed location. 13    A class 2 brewer shall, prior to transferring beer to a 14brew pub wholly owned by the class 2 brewer, furnish a written 15notice to the State Commission of intent to transfer beer 16setting forth the name and address of the brew pub and shall 17annually submit to the State Commission a verified report 18identifying the total gallons of beer transferred to the brew 19pub wholly owned by the class 2 brewer. 20    Class 14. A class 3 brewer license, which may be issued to 21a brewer or a non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture 22of no more than 465,000 gallons of beer per year and no more 23than 155,000 gallons at a single brewery premises, and shall 24allow the sale of no more than 6,200 gallons of beer from each 25in-state or out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, or 18,600 26gallons in the aggregate, to retail licensees, class 1   HB3694- 39 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1brewers, class 2 brewers, and class 3 brewers as long as the 2class 3 brewer licensee does not manufacture more than a 3combined 465,000 gallons of beer per year and is not a member 4of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 5that produces more than 465,000 gallons of beer per year to 6make sales to importing distributors, distributors, retail 7licensees, brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 brewers, and 8class 3 brewers in accordance with the conditions set forth in 9paragraph (20) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12. If the State 10Commission provides prior approval, a class 3 brewer may 11annually transfer up to 155,000 gallons of beer manufactured 12by that class 3 brewer to the premises of a licensed class 3 13brewer wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. A class 143 brewer shall manufacture beer at the brewer's class 3 15designated licensed premises, and may sell beer as otherwise 16provided in this Act. 17    Class 15. A class 3 craft distiller license, which may be 18issued to a distiller or a non-resident dealer, shall allow 19the manufacture of no more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per 20year and shall allow the sale of spirits from the class 3 craft 21distiller's in-state or out-of-state class 3 craft distillery 22premises to retail licensees, class 3 brewers, and class 3 23craft distillers as long as the class 3 craft distiller 24licensee does not manufacture more than a combined 100,000 25gallons of spirits per year and is not a member of or 26affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that   HB3694- 40 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1produces more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year and to 2make sales to importing distributors, distributors, retail 3licensees, class 3 brewers, and class 3 craft distillers in 4accordance with the conditions set forth in paragraph (21) of 5subsection (a) of Section 3-12. If the State Commission 6provides prior approval, a class 3 craft distiller may 7annually transfer up to 5,000 gallons of spirits manufactured 8by that class 3 craft distiller to the premises of a licensed 9class 3 craft distiller wholly owned and operated by the same 10licensee. A class 3 craft distiller shall manufacture spirits 11at the distiller's class 3 designated licensed premises and 12may sell spirits as otherwise provided in this Act. 13    (a-1) A manufacturer which is licensed in this State to 14make sales or deliveries of alcoholic liquor to licensed 15distributors or importing distributors and which enlists 16agents, representatives, or individuals acting on its behalf 17who contact licensed retailers on a regular and continual 18basis in this State must register those agents, 19representatives, or persons acting on its behalf with the 20State Commission.21    Registration of agents, representatives, or persons acting 22on behalf of a manufacturer is fulfilled by submitting a form 23to the Commission. The form shall be developed by the 24Commission and shall include the name and address of the 25applicant, the name and address of the manufacturer he or she 26represents, the territory or areas assigned to sell to or   HB3694- 41 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1discuss pricing terms of alcoholic liquor, and any other 2questions deemed appropriate and necessary. All statements in 3the forms required to be made by law or by rule shall be deemed 4material, and any person who knowingly misstates any material 5fact under oath in an application is guilty of a Class B 6misdemeanor. Fraud, misrepresentation, false statements, 7misleading statements, evasions, or suppression of material 8facts in the securing of a registration are grounds for 9suspension or revocation of the registration. The State 10Commission shall post a list of registered agents on the 11Commission's website.12    (b) A distributor's license shall allow (i) the wholesale 13purchase and storage of alcoholic liquors and sale of 14alcoholic liquors to licensees in this State and to persons 15without the State, as may be permitted by law; (ii) the sale of 16beer, cider, mead, or any combination thereof to brewers, 17class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to 18subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, 19mead, or any combination thereof to non-licensees at their 20breweries; (iii) the sale of vermouth to class 1 craft 21distillers and class 2 craft distillers that, pursuant to 22subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell spirits, 23vermouth, or both spirits and vermouth to non-licensees at 24their distilleries; or (iv) as otherwise provided in this Act. 25No person licensed as a distributor shall be granted a 26non-resident dealer's license.  HB3694- 42 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    (c) An importing distributor's license may be issued to 2and held by those only who are duly licensed distributors, 3upon the filing of an application by a duly licensed 4distributor, with the Commission and the Commission shall, 5without the payment of any fee, immediately issue such 6importing distributor's license to the applicant, which shall 7allow the importation of alcoholic liquor by the licensee into 8this State from any point in the United States outside this 9State, and the purchase of alcoholic liquor in barrels, casks 10or other bulk containers and the bottling of such alcoholic 11liquors before resale thereof, but all bottles or containers 12so filled shall be sealed, labeled, stamped and otherwise made 13to comply with all provisions, rules and regulations governing 14manufacturers in the preparation and bottling of alcoholic 15liquors. The importing distributor's license shall permit such 16licensee to purchase alcoholic liquor from Illinois licensed 17non-resident dealers and foreign importers only. No person 18licensed as an importing distributor shall be granted a 19non-resident dealer's license.20    (d) A retailer's license shall allow the licensee to sell 21and offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in 22the license, alcoholic liquor for use or consumption, but not 23for resale in any form. Except as provided in Section 6-16, 246-29, or 6-29.1, nothing in this Act shall deny, limit, 25remove, or restrict the ability of a holder of a retailer's 26license to transfer or ship alcoholic liquor to the purchaser   HB3694- 43 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1for use or consumption subject to any applicable local law or 2ordinance. For the purposes of this Section, "shipping" means 3the movement of alcoholic liquor from a licensed retailer to a 4consumer via a common carrier. Except as provided in Section 56-16, 6-29, or 6-29.1, nothing in this Act shall deny, limit, 6remove, or restrict the ability of a holder of a retailer's 7license to deliver alcoholic liquor to the purchaser for use 8or consumption. The delivery shall be made only within 12 9hours from the time the alcoholic liquor leaves the licensed 10premises of the retailer for delivery. For the purposes of 11this Section, "delivery" means the movement of alcoholic 12liquor purchased from a licensed retailer to a consumer 13through the following methods:14        (1) delivery within licensed retailer's parking lot, 15    including curbside, for pickup by the consumer;16        (2) delivery by an owner, officer, director, 17    shareholder, or employee of the licensed retailer; or18        (3) delivery by a third-party contractor, independent 19    contractor, or agent with whom the licensed retailer has 20    contracted to make deliveries of alcoholic liquors. 21    Under subsection (1), (2), or (3), delivery shall not 22include the use of common carriers. 23    Any retail license issued to a manufacturer shall only 24permit the manufacturer to sell beer at retail on the premises 25actually occupied by the manufacturer. For the purpose of 26further describing the type of business conducted at a retail   HB3694- 44 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1licensed premises, a retailer's licensee may be designated by 2the State Commission as (i) an on premise consumption 3retailer, (ii) an off premise sale retailer, or (iii) a 4combined on premise consumption and off premise sale retailer. 5    Except for a municipality with a population of more than 61,000,000 inhabitants, a home rule unit may not regulate the 7delivery of alcoholic liquor inconsistent with this 8subsection. This paragraph is a limitation under subsection 9(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on 10the concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and 11functions exercised by the State. A non-home rule municipality 12may not regulate the delivery of alcoholic liquor inconsistent 13with this subsection. 14    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 15(d), a retail licensee may sell alcoholic liquors to a special 16event retailer licensee for resale to the extent permitted 17under subsection (e).18    (e) A special event retailer's license (not-for-profit) 19shall permit the licensee to purchase alcoholic liquors from 20an Illinois licensed distributor (unless the licensee 21purchases less than $500 of alcoholic liquors for the special 22event, in which case the licensee may purchase the alcoholic 23liquors from a licensed retailer) and shall allow the licensee 24to sell and offer for sale, at retail, alcoholic liquors for 25use or consumption, but not for resale in any form and only at 26the location and on the specific dates designated for the   HB3694- 45 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1special event in the license. An applicant for a special event 2retailer license must (i) furnish with the application: (A) a 3resale number issued under Section 2c of the Retailers' 4Occupation Tax Act or evidence that the applicant is 5registered under Section 2a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 6Act, (B) a current, valid exemption identification number 7issued under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 8and a certification to the Commission that the purchase of 9alcoholic liquors will be a tax-exempt purchase, or (C) a 10statement that the applicant is not registered under Section 112a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, does not hold a resale 12number under Section 2c of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 13and does not hold an exemption number under Section 1g of the 14Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, in which event the Commission 15shall set forth on the special event retailer's license a 16statement to that effect; (ii) submit with the application 17proof satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant 18will provide dram shop liability insurance in the maximum 19limits; and (iii) show proof satisfactory to the State 20Commission that the applicant has obtained local authority 21approval.22    Nothing in this Act prohibits an Illinois licensed 23distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 24salable alcoholic liquors to a holder of a special event 25retailer's license or the special event retailer's licensee 26from accepting the credit or refund of alcoholic liquors at   HB3694- 46 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1the conclusion of the event specified in the license.2    (f) A railroad license shall permit the licensee to import 3alcoholic liquors into this State from any point in the United 4States outside this State and to store such alcoholic liquors 5in this State; to make wholesale purchases of alcoholic 6liquors directly from manufacturers, foreign importers, 7distributors and importing distributors from within or outside 8this State; and to store such alcoholic liquors in this State; 9provided that the above powers may be exercised only in 10connection with the importation, purchase or storage of 11alcoholic liquors to be sold or dispensed on a club, buffet, 12lounge or dining car operated on an electric, gas or steam 13railway in this State; and provided further, that railroad 14licensees exercising the above powers shall be subject to all 15provisions of Article VIII of this Act as applied to importing 16distributors. A railroad license shall also permit the 17licensee to sell or dispense alcoholic liquors on any club, 18buffet, lounge or dining car operated on an electric, gas or 19steam railway regularly operated by a common carrier in this 20State, but shall not permit the sale for resale of any 21alcoholic liquors to any licensee within this State. A license 22shall be obtained for each car in which such sales are made.23    (g) A boat license shall allow the sale of alcoholic 24liquor in individual drinks, on any passenger boat regularly 25operated as a common carrier on navigable waters in this State 26or on any riverboat operated under the Illinois Gambling Act,   HB3694- 47 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1which boat or riverboat maintains a public dining room or 2restaurant thereon.3    (h) A non-beverage user's license shall allow the licensee 4to purchase alcoholic liquor from a licensed manufacturer or 5importing distributor, without the imposition of any tax upon 6the business of such licensed manufacturer or importing 7distributor as to such alcoholic liquor to be used by such 8licensee solely for the non-beverage purposes set forth in 9subsection (a) of Section 8-1 of this Act, and such licenses 10shall be divided and classified and shall permit the purchase, 11possession and use of limited and stated quantities of 12alcoholic liquor as follows:13Class 1, not to exceed ......................... 500 gallons 14Class 2, not to exceed ....................... 1,000 gallons 15Class 3, not to exceed ....................... 5,000 gallons 16Class 4, not to exceed ...................... 10,000 gallons 17Class 5, not to exceed ....................... 50,000 gallons18    (i) A wine-maker's premises license shall allow a licensee 19that concurrently holds a first-class wine-maker's license to 20sell and offer for sale at retail in the premises specified in 21such license not more than 50,000 gallons of the first-class 22wine-maker's wine that is made at the first-class wine-maker's 23licensed premises per year for use or consumption, but not for 24resale in any form. A wine-maker's premises license shall 25allow a licensee who concurrently holds a second-class 26wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale at retail in   HB3694- 48 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1the premises specified in such license up to 100,000 gallons 2of the second-class wine-maker's wine that is made at the 3second-class wine-maker's licensed premises per year for use 4or consumption but not for resale in any form. A first-class 5wine-maker that concurrently holds a class 1 brewer license or 6a class 1 craft distiller license shall not be eligible to hold 7a wine-maker's premises license. A wine-maker's premises 8license shall allow a licensee that concurrently holds a 9first-class wine-maker's license or a second-class 10wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale at retail at 11the premises specified in the wine-maker's premises license, 12for use or consumption but not for resale in any form, any 13beer, wine, and spirits purchased from a licensed distributor. 14Upon approval from the State Commission, a wine-maker's 15premises license shall allow the licensee to sell and offer 16for sale at (i) the wine-maker's licensed premises and (ii) at 17up to 2 additional locations for use and consumption and not 18for resale. Each location shall require additional licensing 19per location as specified in Section 5-3 of this Act. A 20wine-maker's premises licensee shall secure liquor liability 21insurance coverage in an amount at least equal to the maximum 22liability amounts set forth in subsection (a) of Section 6-21 23of this Act. 24    (j) An airplane license shall permit the licensee to 25import alcoholic liquors into this State from any point in the 26United States outside this State and to store such alcoholic   HB3694- 49 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1liquors in this State; to make wholesale purchases of 2alcoholic liquors directly from manufacturers, foreign 3importers, distributors and importing distributors from within 4or outside this State; and to store such alcoholic liquors in 5this State; provided that the above powers may be exercised 6only in connection with the importation, purchase or storage 7of alcoholic liquors to be sold or dispensed on an airplane; 8and provided further, that airplane licensees exercising the 9above powers shall be subject to all provisions of Article 10VIII of this Act as applied to importing distributors. An 11airplane licensee shall also permit the sale or dispensing of 12alcoholic liquors on any passenger airplane regularly operated 13by a common carrier in this State, but shall not permit the 14sale for resale of any alcoholic liquors to any licensee 15within this State. A single airplane license shall be required 16of an airline company if liquor service is provided on board 17aircraft in this State. The annual fee for such license shall 18be as determined in Section 5-3.19    (k) A foreign importer's license shall permit such 20licensee to purchase alcoholic liquor from Illinois licensed 21non-resident dealers only, and to import alcoholic liquor 22other than in bulk from any point outside the United States and 23to sell such alcoholic liquor to Illinois licensed importing 24distributors and to no one else in Illinois; provided that (i) 25the foreign importer registers with the State Commission every 26brand of alcoholic liquor that it proposes to sell to Illinois   HB3694- 50 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1licensees during the license period, (ii) the foreign importer 2complies with all of the provisions of Section 6-9 of this Act 3with respect to registration of such Illinois licensees as may 4be granted the right to sell such brands at wholesale, and 5(iii) the foreign importer complies with the provisions of 6Sections 6-5 and 6-6 of this Act to the same extent that these 7provisions apply to manufacturers.8    (l) (i) A broker's license shall be required of all 9persons who solicit orders for, offer to sell or offer to 10supply alcoholic liquor to retailers in the State of Illinois, 11or who offer to retailers to ship or cause to be shipped or to 12make contact with distillers, craft distillers, rectifiers, 13brewers or manufacturers or any other party within or without 14the State of Illinois in order that alcoholic liquors be 15shipped to a distributor, importing distributor or foreign 16importer, whether such solicitation or offer is consummated 17within or without the State of Illinois.18    No holder of a retailer's license issued by the Illinois 19Liquor Control Commission shall purchase or receive any 20alcoholic liquor, the order for which was solicited or offered 21for sale to such retailer by a broker unless the broker is the 22holder of a valid broker's license.23    The broker shall, upon the acceptance by a retailer of the 24broker's solicitation of an order or offer to sell or supply or 25deliver or have delivered alcoholic liquors, promptly forward 26to the Illinois Liquor Control Commission a notification of   HB3694- 51 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1said transaction in such form as the Commission may by 2regulations prescribe.3    (ii) A broker's license shall be required of a person 4within this State, other than a retail licensee, who, for a fee 5or commission, promotes, solicits, or accepts orders for 6alcoholic liquor, for use or consumption and not for resale, 7to be shipped from this State and delivered to residents 8outside of this State by an express company, common carrier, 9or contract carrier. This Section does not apply to any person 10who promotes, solicits, or accepts orders for wine as 11specifically authorized in Section 6-29 of this Act.12    A broker's license under this subsection (l) shall not 13entitle the holder to buy or sell any alcoholic liquors for his 14own account or to take or deliver title to such alcoholic 15liquors.16    This subsection (l) shall not apply to distributors, 17employees of distributors, or employees of a manufacturer who 18has registered the trademark, brand or name of the alcoholic 19liquor pursuant to Section 6-9 of this Act, and who regularly 20sells such alcoholic liquor in the State of Illinois only to 21its registrants thereunder.22    Any agent, representative, or person subject to 23registration pursuant to subsection (a-1) of this Section 24shall not be eligible to receive a broker's license.25    (m) A non-resident dealer's license shall permit such 26licensee to ship into and warehouse alcoholic liquor into this   HB3694- 52 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1State from any point outside of this State, and to sell such 2alcoholic liquor to Illinois licensed foreign importers and 3importing distributors and to no one else in this State; 4provided that (i) said non-resident dealer shall register with 5the Illinois Liquor Control Commission each and every brand of 6alcoholic liquor which it proposes to sell to Illinois 7licensees during the license period, (ii) it shall comply with 8all of the provisions of Section 6-9 hereof with respect to 9registration of such Illinois licensees as may be granted the 10right to sell such brands at wholesale by duly filing such 11registration statement, thereby authorizing the non-resident 12dealer to proceed to sell such brands at wholesale, and (iii) 13the non-resident dealer shall comply with the provisions of 14Sections 6-5 and 6-6 of this Act to the same extent that these 15provisions apply to manufacturers. No person licensed as a 16non-resident dealer shall be granted a distributor's or 17importing distributor's license.18    (n) A brew pub license shall allow the licensee to only (i) 19manufacture up to 155,000 gallons of beer per year only on the 20premises specified in the license, (ii) make sales of the beer 21manufactured on the premises or, with the approval of the 22Commission, beer manufactured on another brew pub licensed 23premises that is wholly owned and operated by the same 24licensee to importing distributors, distributors, and to 25non-licensees for use and consumption, (iii) store the beer 26upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer for sale at retail from   HB3694- 53 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1the licensed premises for off-premises consumption no more 2than 155,000 gallons per year so long as such sales are only 3made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at retail for use 4and consumption on the premises specified in the license any 5form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a licensed distributor 6or importing distributor, (vi) with the prior approval of the 7Commission, annually transfer no more than 155,000 gallons of 8beer manufactured on the premises to a licensed brew pub 9wholly owned and operated by the same licensee, and (vii) 10notwithstanding item (i) of this subsection, brew pubs wholly 11owned and operated by the same licensee may combine each 12location's production limit of 155,000 gallons of beer per 13year and allocate the aggregate total between the wholly 14owned, operated, and licensed locations.15    A brew pub licensee shall not under any circumstance sell 16or offer for sale beer manufactured by the brew pub licensee to 17retail licensees. 18    A person who holds a class 2 brewer license may 19simultaneously hold a brew pub license if the class 2 brewer 20(i) does not, under any circumstance, sell or offer for sale 21beer manufactured by the class 2 brewer to retail licensees; 22(ii) does not hold more than 3 brew pub licenses in this State; 23(iii) does not manufacture more than a combined 3,720,000 24gallons of beer per year, including the beer manufactured at 25the brew pub; and (iv) is not a member of or affiliated with, 26directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than   HB3694- 54 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b13,720,000 gallons of beer per year or any other alcoholic 2liquor.3    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 4licensed brewer, class 2 brewer, or non-resident dealer who 5before July 1, 2015 manufactured less than 3,720,000 gallons 6of beer per year and held a brew pub license on or before July 71, 2015 may (i) continue to qualify for and hold that brew pub 8license for the licensed premises and (ii) manufacture more 9than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year and continue to 10qualify for and hold that brew pub license if that brewer, 11class 2 brewer, or non-resident dealer does not simultaneously 12hold a class 1 brewer license and is not a member of or 13affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 14produces more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year or that 15produces any other alcoholic liquor. 16    A brew pub licensee may apply for a class 3 brewer license 17and, upon meeting all applicable qualifications of this Act 18and relinquishing all commonly owned brew pub or retail 19licenses, shall be issued a class 3 brewer license. Nothing in 20this Act shall prohibit the issuance of a class 3 brewer 21license if the applicant:22        (1) has a valid retail license on or before May 1, 23    2021;24        (2) has an ownership interest in at least two brew 25    pubs licenses on or before May 1, 2021;26        (3) the brew pub licensee applies for a class 3 brewer   HB3694- 55 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    license on or before October 1, 2022 and relinquishes all 2    commonly owned brew pub licenses; and3        (4) relinquishes all commonly owned retail licenses on 4    or before December 31, 2022.5    If a brew pub licensee is issued a class 3 brewer license, 6the class 3 brewer license shall expire on the same date as the 7existing brew pub license and the State Commission shall not 8require a class 3 brewer licensee to obtain a brewer license, 9or in the alternative to pay a fee for a brewer license, until 10the date the brew pub license of the applicant would have 11expired. 12    (o) A caterer retailer license shall allow the holder to 13serve alcoholic liquors as an incidental part of a food 14service that serves prepared meals which excludes the serving 15of snacks as the primary meal, either on or off-site whether 16licensed or unlicensed. A caterer retailer license shall allow 17the holder, a distributor, or an importing distributor to 18transfer any inventory to and from the holder's retail 19premises and shall allow the holder to purchase alcoholic 20liquor from a distributor or importing distributor to be 21delivered directly to an off-site event.22    Nothing in this Act prohibits a distributor or importing 23distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 24salable beer to a holder of a caterer retailer license or a 25caterer retailer licensee from accepting a credit or refund 26for unused, salable beer, in the event an act of God is the   HB3694- 56 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1sole reason an off-site event is cancelled and if: (i) the 2holder of a caterer retailer license has not transferred 3alcoholic liquor from its caterer retailer premises to an 4off-site location; (ii) the distributor or importing 5distributor offers the credit or refund for the unused, 6salable beer that it delivered to the off-site premises and 7not for any unused, salable beer that the distributor or 8importing distributor delivered to the caterer retailer's 9premises; and (iii) the unused, salable beer would likely 10spoil if transferred to the caterer retailer's premises. A 11caterer retailer license shall allow the holder to transfer 12any inventory from any off-site location to its caterer 13retailer premises at the conclusion of an off-site event or 14engage a distributor or importing distributor to transfer any 15inventory from any off-site location to its caterer retailer 16premises at the conclusion of an off-site event, provided that 17the distributor or importing distributor issues bona fide 18charges to the caterer retailer licensee for fuel, labor, and 19delivery and the distributor or importing distributor collects 20payment from the caterer retailer licensee prior to the 21distributor or importing distributor transferring inventory to 22the caterer retailer premises.23    For purposes of this subsection (o), an "act of God" means 24an unforeseeable event, such as a rain or snow storm, hail, a 25flood, or a similar event, that is the sole cause of the 26cancellation of an off-site, outdoor event.  HB3694- 57 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    (p) An auction liquor license shall allow the licensee to 2sell and offer for sale at auction wine and spirits for use or 3consumption, or for resale by an Illinois liquor licensee in 4accordance with provisions of this Act. An auction liquor 5license will be issued to a person and it will permit the 6auction liquor licensee to hold the auction anywhere in the 7State. An auction liquor license must be obtained for each 8auction at least 14 days in advance of the auction date.9    (q) A special use permit license shall allow an Illinois 10licensed retailer to transfer a portion of its alcoholic 11liquor inventory from its retail licensed premises to the 12premises specified in the license hereby created; to purchase 13alcoholic liquor from a distributor or importing distributor 14to be delivered directly to the location specified in the 15license hereby created; and to sell or offer for sale at 16retail, only in the premises specified in the license hereby 17created, the transferred or delivered alcoholic liquor for use 18or consumption, but not for resale in any form. A special use 19permit license may be granted for the following time periods: 20one day or less; 2 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per 21location in any 12-month period. An applicant for the special 22use permit license must also submit with the application proof 23satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 24provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits 25and have local authority approval.26    A special use permit license shall allow the holder to   HB3694- 58 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1transfer any inventory from the holder's special use premises 2to its retail premises at the conclusion of the special use 3event or engage a distributor or importing distributor to 4transfer any inventory from the holder's special use premises 5to its retail premises at the conclusion of an off-site event, 6provided that the distributor or importing distributor issues 7bona fide charges to the special use permit licensee for fuel, 8labor, and delivery and the distributor or importing 9distributor collects payment from the retail licensee prior to 10the distributor or importing distributor transferring 11inventory to the retail premises.12    Nothing in this Act prohibits a distributor or importing 13distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 14salable beer to a special use permit licensee or a special use 15permit licensee from accepting a credit or refund for unused, 16salable beer at the conclusion of the event specified in the 17license if: (i) the holder of the special use permit license 18has not transferred alcoholic liquor from its retail licensed 19premises to the premises specified in the special use permit 20license; (ii) the distributor or importing distributor offers 21the credit or refund for the unused, salable beer that it 22delivered to the premises specified in the special use permit 23license and not for any unused, salable beer that the 24distributor or importing distributor delivered to the 25retailer's premises; and (iii) the unused, salable beer would 26likely spoil if transferred to the retailer premises.  HB3694- 59 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    (r) A winery shipper's license shall allow a person with a 2first-class or second-class wine manufacturer's license, a 3first-class or second-class wine-maker's license, or a limited 4wine manufacturer's license or who is licensed to make wine 5under the laws of another state to ship wine made by that 6licensee directly to a resident of this State who is 21 years 7of age or older for that resident's personal use and not for 8resale. Prior to receiving a winery shipper's license, an 9applicant for the license must provide the Commission with a 10true copy of its current license in any state in which it is 11licensed as a manufacturer of wine. An applicant for a winery 12shipper's license must also complete an application form that 13provides any other information the Commission deems necessary. 14The application form shall include all addresses from which 15the applicant for a winery shipper's license intends to ship 16wine, including the name and address of any third party, 17except for a common carrier, authorized to ship wine on behalf 18of the manufacturer. The application form shall include an 19acknowledgement consenting to the jurisdiction of the 20Commission, the Illinois Department of Revenue, and the courts 21of this State concerning the enforcement of this Act and any 22related laws, rules, and regulations, including authorizing 23the Department of Revenue and the Commission to conduct audits 24for the purpose of ensuring compliance with Public Act 95-634, 25and an acknowledgement that the wine manufacturer is in 26compliance with Section 6-2 of this Act. Any third party,   HB3694- 60 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1except for a common carrier, authorized to ship wine on behalf 2of a first-class or second-class wine manufacturer's licensee, 3a first-class or second-class wine-maker's licensee, a limited 4wine manufacturer's licensee, or a person who is licensed to 5make wine under the laws of another state shall also be 6disclosed by the winery shipper's licensee, and a copy of the 7written appointment of the third-party wine provider, except 8for a common carrier, to the wine manufacturer shall be filed 9with the State Commission as a supplement to the winery 10shipper's license application or any renewal thereof. The 11winery shipper's license holder shall affirm under penalty of 12perjury, as part of the winery shipper's license application 13or renewal, that he or she only ships wine, either directly or 14indirectly through a third-party provider, from the licensee's 15own production.16    Except for a common carrier, a third-party provider 17shipping wine on behalf of a winery shipper's license holder 18is the agent of the winery shipper's license holder and, as 19such, a winery shipper's license holder is responsible for the 20acts and omissions of the third-party provider acting on 21behalf of the license holder. A third-party provider, except 22for a common carrier, that engages in shipping wine into 23Illinois on behalf of a winery shipper's license holder shall 24consent to the jurisdiction of the State Commission and the 25State. Any third-party, except for a common carrier, holding 26such an appointment shall, by February 1 of each calendar year   HB3694- 61 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1and upon request by the State Commission or the Department of 2Revenue, file with the State Commission a statement detailing 3each shipment made to an Illinois resident. The statement 4shall include the name and address of the third-party provider 5filing the statement, the time period covered by the 6statement, and the following information: 7        (1) the name, address, and license number of the 8    winery shipper on whose behalf the shipment was made;9        (2) the quantity of the products delivered; and10        (3) the date and address of the shipment. 11If the Department of Revenue or the State Commission requests 12a statement under this paragraph, the third-party provider 13must provide that statement no later than 30 days after the 14request is made. Any books, records, supporting papers, and 15documents containing information and data relating to a 16statement under this paragraph shall be kept and preserved for 17a period of 3 years, unless their destruction sooner is 18authorized, in writing, by the Director of Revenue, and shall 19be open and available to inspection by the Director of Revenue 20or the State Commission or any duly authorized officer, agent, 21or employee of the State Commission or the Department of 22Revenue, at all times during business hours of the day. Any 23person who violates any provision of this paragraph or any 24rule of the State Commission for the administration and 25enforcement of the provisions of this paragraph is guilty of a 26Class C misdemeanor. In case of a continuing violation, each   HB3694- 62 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1day's continuance thereof shall be a separate and distinct 2offense. 3    The State Commission shall adopt rules as soon as 4practicable to implement the requirements of Public Act 99-904 5and shall adopt rules prohibiting any such third-party 6appointment of a third-party provider, except for a common 7carrier, that has been deemed by the State Commission to have 8violated the provisions of this Act with regard to any winery 9shipper licensee.10    A winery shipper licensee must pay to the Department of 11Revenue the State liquor gallonage tax under Section 8-1 for 12all wine that is sold by the licensee and shipped to a person 13in this State. For the purposes of Section 8-1, a winery 14shipper licensee shall be taxed in the same manner as a 15manufacturer of wine. A licensee who is not otherwise required 16to register under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act must 17register under the Use Tax Act to collect and remit use tax to 18the Department of Revenue for all gallons of wine that are sold 19by the licensee and shipped to persons in this State. If a 20licensee fails to remit the tax imposed under this Act in 21accordance with the provisions of Article VIII of this Act, 22the winery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance 23with the provisions of Article VII of this Act. If a licensee 24fails to properly register and remit tax under the Use Tax Act 25or the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act for all wine that is sold 26by the winery shipper and shipped to persons in this State, the   HB3694- 63 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1winery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance with 2the provisions of Article VII of this Act.3    A winery shipper licensee must collect, maintain, and 4submit to the Commission on a semi-annual basis the total 5number of cases per resident of wine shipped to residents of 6this State. A winery shipper licensed under this subsection 7(r) must comply with the requirements of Section 6-29 of this 8Act.9    Pursuant to paragraph (5.1) or (5.3) of subsection (a) of 10Section 3-12, the State Commission may receive, respond to, 11and investigate any complaint and impose any of the remedies 12specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12.13    As used in this subsection, "third-party provider" means 14any entity that provides fulfillment house services, including 15warehousing, packaging, distribution, order processing, or 16shipment of wine, but not the sale of wine, on behalf of a 17licensed winery shipper. 18    (s) A craft distiller tasting permit license shall allow 19an Illinois licensed class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 20distiller to transfer a portion of its alcoholic liquor 21inventory from its class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 22distiller licensed premises to the premises specified in the 23license hereby created and to conduct a sampling, only in the 24premises specified in the license hereby created, of the 25transferred alcoholic liquor in accordance with subsection (c) 26of Section 6-31 of this Act. The transferred alcoholic liquor   HB3694- 64 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1may not be sold or resold in any form. An applicant for the 2craft distiller tasting permit license must also submit with 3the application proof satisfactory to the State Commission 4that the applicant will provide dram shop liability insurance 5to the maximum limits and have local authority approval.6    (t) A brewer warehouse permit may be issued to the holder 7of a class 1 brewer license or a class 2 brewer license. If the 8holder of the permit is a class 1 brewer licensee, the brewer 9warehouse permit shall allow the holder to store or warehouse 10up to 930,000 gallons of tax-determined beer manufactured by 11the holder of the permit at the premises specified on the 12permit. If the holder of the permit is a class 2 brewer 13licensee, the brewer warehouse permit shall allow the holder 14to store or warehouse up to 3,720,000 gallons of 15tax-determined beer manufactured by the holder of the permit 16at the premises specified on the permit. Sales to 17non-licensees are prohibited at the premises specified in the 18brewer warehouse permit. 19    (u) A distilling pub license shall allow the licensee to 20only (i) manufacture up to 5,000 gallons of spirits per year 21only on the premises specified in the license, (ii) make sales 22of the spirits manufactured on the premises or, with the 23approval of the State Commission, spirits manufactured on 24another distilling pub licensed premises that is wholly owned 25and operated by the same licensee to importing distributors 26and distributors and to non-licensees for use and consumption,   HB3694- 65 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1(iii) store the spirits upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer 2for sale at retail from the licensed premises for off-premises 3consumption no more than 5,000 gallons per year so long as such 4sales are only made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at 5retail for use and consumption on the premises specified in 6the license any form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a 7licensed distributor or importing distributor, and (vi) with 8the prior approval of the State Commission, annually transfer 9no more than 5,000 gallons of spirits manufactured on the 10premises to a licensed distilling pub wholly owned and 11operated by the same licensee. 12    A distilling pub licensee shall not under any circumstance 13sell or offer for sale spirits manufactured by the distilling 14pub licensee to retail licensees. 15    A person who holds a class 2 craft distiller license may 16simultaneously hold a distilling pub license if the class 2 17craft distiller (i) does not, under any circumstance, sell or 18offer for sale spirits manufactured by the class 2 craft 19distiller to retail licensees; (ii) does not hold more than 3 20distilling pub licenses in this State; (iii) does not 21manufacture more than a combined 100,000 gallons of spirits 22per year, including the spirits manufactured at the distilling 23pub; and (iv) is not a member of or affiliated with, directly 24or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 25gallons of spirits per year or any other alcoholic liquor. 26    (v) A craft distiller warehouse permit may be issued to   HB3694- 66 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1the holder of a class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 2distiller license. The craft distiller warehouse permit shall 3allow the holder to store or warehouse up to 500,000 gallons of 4spirits manufactured by the holder of the permit at the 5premises specified on the permit. Sales to non-licensees are 6prohibited at the premises specified in the craft distiller 7warehouse permit. 8    (w) A beer showcase permit license shall allow an 9Illinois-licensed distributor to transfer a portion of its 10beer inventory from its licensed premises to the premises 11specified in the beer showcase permit license, and, in the 12case of a class 3 brewer, transfer only beer the class 3 brewer 13manufactures from its licensed premises to the premises 14specified in the beer showcase permit license; and to sell or 15offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in the 16beer showcase permit license, the transferred or delivered 17beer for on or off premise consumption, but not for resale in 18any form and to sell to non-licensees not more than 96 fluid 19ounces of beer per person. A beer showcase permit license may 20be granted for the following time periods: one day or less; or 212 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per location in any 2212-month period. An applicant for a beer showcase permit 23license must also submit with the application proof 24satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 25provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits 26and have local authority approval. The State Commission shall   HB3694- 67 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1require the beer showcase applicant to comply with Section 26-27.1. 3    (x) A distillery shipper's license shall allow a person 4with an Illinois distiller license, a craft distiller license, 5a class 1 craft distiller license, a class 2 craft distiller 6license, or a class 3 craft distiller license or who is 7licensed to make spirits under the laws of another state to 8ship spirits directly to a resident of this State who is 21 9years of age or older for that resident's personal use and not 10for resale. Prior to receiving a distillery shipper's license, 11an applicant for the license must provide the State Commission 12with a true copy of its current license in any state in which 13it is licensed as a distiller. An applicant for a distillery 14shipper's license must also complete an application form that 15provides any other information the State Commission deems 16necessary. The application form shall include an 17acknowledgement consenting to the jurisdiction of the State 18Commission, the Illinois Department of Revenue, and the courts 19of this State concerning the enforcement of this Act and any 20related laws, rules, and regulations, including authorizing 21the Illinois Department of Revenue and the State Commission to 22conduct audits for the purpose of ensuring compliance with 23this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 24    A distillery shipper's licensee must pay to the Illinois 25Department of Revenue the State liquor gallonage tax under 26Section 8-1 for all spirits that are sold by the licensee and   HB3694- 68 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1shipped to a person in this State. For the purposes of Section 28-1, an out-of-state distillery shipper's licensee shall be 3taxed in the same manner as a manufacturer of spirits. A 4licensee who is not otherwise required to register under the 5Retailers' Occupation Tax Act must register under the Use Tax 6Act to collect and remit use tax to the Illinois Department of 7Revenue for all gallons of spirits that are sold by the 8licensee and shipped to persons in this State. If a licensee 9fails to remit the tax imposed under this Act in accordance 10with the provisions of Article VIII of this Act, the 11distillery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance 12with the provisions of Article VII of this Act. If a licensee 13fails to properly register and remit tax under the Use Tax Act 14or the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act for all spirits that are 15sold by the distillery shipper and shipped to persons in this 16State, the distillery shipper's license shall be revoked in 17accordance with the provisions of Article VII of this Act. 18    A distillery shipper's licensee must collect, maintain, 19and submit to the State Commission on a semi-annual basis the 20total gallons of spirits per resident shipped to residents of 21this State. A distillery shipper licensed under this 22subsection must comply with the requirements of Section 236-29.05 of this Act. Pursuant to paragraph (5.1) or (5.3) of 24subsection (a) of Section 3-12, the State Commission may 25receive, respond to, and investigate any complaint and impose 26any of the remedies specified in paragraph (1) of subsection   HB3694- 69 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1(a) of Section 3-12. 2    Except as provided in Section 6-16, 6-29, or 6-29.05, 3nothing in this Act shall deny, limit, remove, or restrict the 4ability of a holder of a distilling pub license to transfer or 5ship alcoholic liquor it produces to the purchaser for use or 6consumption subject to any applicable local law or ordinance. 7Except as provided in Section 6-16, 6-29, or 6-29.05, nothing 8in this Act shall limit, remove, or restrict the ability of a 9holder of a distilling pub license to deliver alcoholic liquor 10to the purchaser for use or consumption. The delivery shall be 11made only within 12 hours after the alcoholic liquor leaves 12the licensed premises of the distilling pub for delivery. 13    For the purposes of this subsection, "delivery" means the 14movement of alcoholic liquor purchased from a licensed 15distilling pub to the consumer through the following methods:16        (1) delivery within the licensed distilling pub 17    parking lot, including curbside, for pickup by the 18    consumer;19        (2) delivery by an owner, officer, director, 20    shareholder, or employee of the licensed distilling pub; 21    or22        (3) delivery by a third-party contractor, independent 23    contractor, or agent with whom the licensed distilling pub 24    has contracted to make deliveries of alcoholic liquors. 25    Under paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, 26"delivery" does not include common carriers.  HB3694- 70 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    For the purposes of this subsection, "ship" means to move 2alcoholic liquor from a licensed distilling pub to a consumer 3via a common carrier.4    Except for a municipality with a population of more than 51,000,000 inhabitants, a home rule unit may not regulate the 6delivery of alcoholic liquor in a manner inconsistent with 7this subsection. This paragraph is a limitation under 8subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 9Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 10powers and functions exercised by the State. 11    (y) A spirits showcase permit shall allow an 12Illinois-licensed distributor to transfer a portion of its 13spirits inventory from its licensed premises to the premises 14specified in the spirits showcase permit; in the case of a 15class 3 craft distiller, to transfer only spirits the class 3 16craft distiller manufactures from its licensed premises to the 17premises specified in the spirits showcase permit; and to sell 18or offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in 19the spirits showcase permit, the transferred or delivered 20spirits for on-premises or off-premises consumption, but not 21for resale in any form and to sell to non-licensees not more 22than 156 fluid ounces of spirits per person. A spirits 23showcase permit may be granted for the following time periods: 24one day or less; or 2 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per 25location in any 12-month period. An applicant for a spirits 26showcase permit must also submit with the application proof   HB3694- 71 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 2provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits 3and have local authority approval. The State Commission shall 4require the spirits showcase applicant to comply with Section 56-27.1. 6(Source: P.A. 101-16, eff. 6-14-19; 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 7101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 101-517, eff. 88-23-19; 101-615, eff. 12-20-19; 101-668, eff. 1-1-22; 9102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23.) 10    (235 ILCS 5/5-3)  (from Ch. 43, par. 118)11    Sec. 5-3. License fees. Except as otherwise provided 12herein, at the time application is made to the State 13Commission for a license of any class, the applicant shall pay 14to the State Commission the fee hereinafter provided for the 15kind of license applied for.16    The fee for licenses issued by the State Commission shall 17be as follows:18OnlineInitial19renewallicense20 or21 non-online22 renewal23    For a manufacturer's license:24    Class 1. Distiller .................$4,000$5,00025    Class 2. Rectifier .................4,000 5,000  HB3694- 72 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    Class 3. Brewer ....................1,200 1,5002    Class 4. First-class Wine 3        Manufacturer ...................7509004    Class 5. Second-class5        Wine Manufacturer ..............1,500 1,7506    Class 6. First-class wine-maker ....750 9007    Class 7. Second-class wine-maker ...1,500 1,7508    Class 8. Limited Wine 9        Manufacturer....................250 350 10    Class 9. Craft Distiller........... 2,000 2,500 11    Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller.. 50 75 12    Class 11. Class 2 Craft Distiller.. 75 100 13    Class 12. Class 1 Brewer............50 7514    Class 13. Class 2 Brewer........... 75 100 15    Class 14. Class 3 Brewer........... 25 50 16    Class 15. Class 3 Craft Distiller.17520017    For a Brew Pub License..............1,2001,50018    For a Distilling Pub License....... 1,200 1,500 19    For a caterer retailer's license....350 50020    For a foreign importer's license ...25 2521    For an importing distributor's 22        license.........................252523    For a distributor's license 24        (11,250,000 gallons 25        or over).......................1,4502,20026    For a distributor's license HB3694- 73 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1        (over 4,500,000 gallons, but2        under 11,250,000 gallons)...... 9501,4503    For a distributor's license4        (4,500,000 gallons or under)....3004505    For a non-resident dealer's license6        (500,000 gallons or over) 7        or with self-distribution 8        privileges .....................1,200 1,5009    For a non-resident dealer's license10        (under 500,000 gallons) ........250 35011    For a wine-maker's premises 12        license ........................25050013    For a winery shipper's license14        (under 250,000 gallons).........200 35015    For a winery shipper's license 16        (250,000 or over, but 17        under 500,000 gallons)..........7501,00018    For a winery shipper's license 19        (500,000 gallons or over).......1,200 1,50020    For a distillery shipper's license21        (under 100,000 gallons).20035022    For a distillery shipper's license23        (100,000 gallons or over).1,2001,50024    For a wine-maker's premises 25        license, second location .......500 1,00026    For a wine-maker's premises   HB3694- 74 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1        license, third location ........5001,0002    For a retailer's license ...........600 7503    For a special event retailer's4        license, (not-for-profit) ......25 255    For a beer showcase permit, 6        one day only .................. 100 150 7        2 days or more ................ 150 250 8    For a spirits showcase permit,9        one day only .100 150 10        2 days or more .150 250 11    For a special use permit license,12        one day only ...................100 15013        2 days or more .................150 25014    For a railroad license .............100 15015    For a boat license .................500 1,00016    For an airplane license, times the17        licensee's maximum number of 18        aircraft in flight, serving 19        liquor over the State at any 20        given time, which either 21        originate, terminate, or make 22        an intermediate stop in 23        the State......................10015024    For a non-beverage user's license:25        Class 1 ........................242426        Class 2 ........................6060  HB3694- 75 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1        Class 3 ........................1201202        Class 4 ........................2402403        Class 5 ........................6006004    For a broker's license .............750 1,0005    For an auction liquor license ......100 1506    For a homebrewer special 7        event permit....................25258    For a craft distiller 9        tasting permit..................25 2510    For a BASSET trainer license....... 300 35011    For a tasting representative 12        license........................20030013    For a brewer warehouse permit...... 252514    For a craft distiller 15        warehouse permit................25 25 16    Fees collected under this Section shall be paid into the 17Dram Shop Fund. The State Commission shall waive license 18renewal fees for those retailers' licenses that are designated 19as "1A" by the State Commission and expire on or after July 1, 202022, and on or before June 30, 2023. One-half of the funds 21received for a retailer's license shall be paid into the Dram 22Shop Fund and one-half of the funds received for a retailer's 23license shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund.24    No fee shall be paid for licenses issued by the State 25Commission to the following non-beverage users:26        (a) Hospitals, sanitariums, or clinics when their use   HB3694- 76 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    of alcoholic liquor is exclusively medicinal, mechanical, 2    or scientific.3        (b) Universities, colleges of learning, or schools 4    when their use of alcoholic liquor is exclusively 5    medicinal, mechanical, or scientific.6        (c) Laboratories when their use is exclusively for the 7    purpose of scientific research.8(Source: P.A. 102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 9102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23; 103-154, eff. 106-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 11    (235 ILCS 5/6-4)  (from Ch. 43, par. 121)12    Sec. 6-4. Prohibited ownership interests; retail sales by 13certain manufacturers. 14    (a) No person licensed by any licensing authority as a 15distiller, or a wine manufacturer, or any subsidiary or 16affiliate thereof, or any officer, associate, member, partner, 17representative, employee, agent or shareholder owning more 18than 5% of the outstanding shares of such person shall be 19issued an importing distributor's or distributor's license, 20nor shall any person licensed by any licensing authority as an 21importing distributor, distributor or retailer, or any 22subsidiary or affiliate thereof, or any officer or associate, 23member, partner, representative, employee, agent or 24shareholder owning more than 5% of the outstanding shares of 25such person be issued a distiller's license, a craft   HB3694- 77 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1distiller's license, or a wine manufacturer's license; and no 2person or persons licensed as a distiller, craft distiller, 3class 1 craft distiller, or class 2 craft distiller by any 4licensing authority shall have any interest, directly or 5indirectly, with such distributor or importing distributor.6    However, an importing distributor or distributor, which on 7January 1, 1985 is owned by a brewer, or any subsidiary or 8affiliate thereof or any officer, associate, member, partner, 9representative, employee, agent or shareholder owning more 10than 5% of the outstanding shares of the importing distributor 11or distributor referred to in this paragraph, may own or 12acquire an ownership interest of more than 5% of the 13outstanding shares of a wine manufacturer and be issued a wine 14manufacturer's license by any licensing authority.15    (b) The foregoing provisions shall not apply to any person 16licensed by any licensing authority as a distiller or wine 17manufacturer, or to any subsidiary or affiliate of any 18distiller or wine manufacturer who shall have been heretofore 19licensed by the State Commission as either an importing 20distributor or distributor during the annual licensing period 21expiring June 30, 1947, and shall actually have made sales 22regularly to retailers.23    (c) Provided, however, that in such instances where a 24distributor's or importing distributor's license has been 25issued to any distiller or wine manufacturer or to any 26subsidiary or affiliate of any distiller or wine manufacturer   HB3694- 78 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1who has, during the licensing period ending June 30, 1947, 2sold or distributed as such licensed distributor or importing 3distributor alcoholic liquors and wines to retailers, such 4distiller or wine manufacturer or any subsidiary or affiliate 5of any distiller or wine manufacturer holding such 6distributor's or importing distributor's license may continue 7to sell or distribute to retailers such alcoholic liquors and 8wines which are manufactured, distilled, processed or marketed 9by distillers and wine manufacturers whose products it sold or 10distributed to retailers during the whole or any part of its 11licensing periods; and such additional brands and additional 12products may be added to the line of such distributor or 13importing distributor, provided, that such brands and such 14products were not sold or distributed by any distributor or 15importing distributor licensed by the State Commission during 16the licensing period ending June 30, 1947, but can not sell or 17distribute to retailers any other alcoholic liquors or wines.18    (d) It shall be unlawful for any distiller licensed 19anywhere to have any stock ownership or interest in any 20distributor's or importing distributor's license wherein any 21other person has an interest therein who is not a distiller and 22does not own more than 5% of any stock in any distillery. 23Nothing herein contained shall apply to such distillers or 24their subsidiaries or affiliates, who had a distributor's or 25importing distributor's license during the licensing period 26ending June 30, 1947, which license was owned in whole by such   HB3694- 79 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1distiller, or subsidiaries or affiliates of such distiller.2    (e) Any person licensed as a brewer, class 1 brewer, or 3class 2 brewer shall be permitted to sell on the licensed 4premises to non-licensees for on or off-premises consumption 5for the premises in which he or she actually conducts such 6business: (i) beer manufactured by the brewer, class 1 brewer, 7class 2 brewer, or class 3 brewer; (ii) beer manufactured by 8any other brewer, class 1 brewer, class 2 brewer, or class 3 9brewer; and (iii) cider or mead. Any person licensed as a class 103 brewer shall be permitted to sell on the licensed premises to 11non-licensees for on or off premises consumption for the 12premises in which he or she actually conducts such business: 13(i) beer manufactured by the class 3 brewer on the premises; 14(ii) beer manufactured by any other brewer, class 1 brewer, 15class 2 brewer, or class 3 brewer; and (iii) cider, wine, and 16spirits. All products sold under this subsection that are not 17manufactured on premises must be purchased through a licensed 18distributor, importing distributor, or manufacturer with 19self-distribution privileges. Such sales shall be limited to 20on-premises, in-person sales only, for lawful consumption on 21or off premises. Such authorization shall be considered a 22privilege granted by the brewer license and, other than a 23manufacturer of beer as stated above, no manufacturer or 24distributor or importing distributor, excluding airplane 25licensees exercising powers provided in paragraph (i) of 26Section 5-1 of this Act, or any subsidiary or affiliate   HB3694- 80 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1thereof, or any officer, associate, member, partner, 2representative, employee or agent, or shareholder shall be 3issued a retailer's license, nor shall any person having a 4retailer's license, excluding airplane licensees exercising 5powers provided in paragraph (i) of Section 5-1 of this Act, or 6any subsidiary or affiliate thereof, or any officer, 7associate, member, partner, representative or agent, or 8shareholder be issued a manufacturer's license or importing 9distributor's license.10    A manufacturer of beer that imports or transfers beer into 11this State must comply with Sections 6-8 and 8-1 of this Act.12    A person who holds a class 2 brewer license and is 13authorized by this Section to sell beer to non-licensees shall 14not sell beer to non-licensees from more than 3 total brewer or 15commonly owned brew pub licensed locations in this State. The 16class 2 brewer shall designate to the State Commission the 17brewer or brew pub locations from which it will sell beer to 18non-licensees.19    A person licensed as a class 1 craft distiller or a class 2 20craft distiller, including a person who holds more than one 21class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft distiller license, 22not affiliated with any other person manufacturing spirits may 23be authorized by the State Commission to sell (1) up to 5,000 24gallons of spirits produced by the person to non-licensees for 25on or off-premises consumption for the premises in which he or 26she actually conducts business permitting only the retail sale   HB3694- 81 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1of spirits manufactured at such premises and (2) vermouth 2purchased through a licensed distributor for on-premises 3consumption. Such sales shall be limited to on-premises, 4in-person sales only, for lawful consumption on or off 5premises, and such authorization shall be considered a 6privilege granted by the class 1 craft distiller or class 2 7craft distiller license. A class 1 craft distiller or class 2 8craft distiller licensed for retail sale shall secure liquor 9liability insurance coverage in an amount at least equal to 10the maximum liability amounts set forth in subsection (a) of 11Section 6-21 of this Act. 12    A class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft distiller 13license holder shall not deliver any alcoholic liquor to any 14non-licensee off the licensed premises. A class 1 craft 15distiller or class 2 craft distiller shall affirm in its 16annual license application that it does not produce more than 1750,000 or 100,000 gallons of distilled spirits annually, 18whichever is applicable, and that the craft distiller does not 19sell more than 5,000 gallons of spirits to non-licensees for 20on or off-premises consumption. In the application, which 21shall be sworn under penalty of perjury, the class 1 craft 22distiller or class 2 craft distiller shall state the volume of 23production and sales for each year since the class 1 craft 24distiller's or class 2 craft distiller's establishment. 25    A person who holds a class 1 craft distiller or class 2 26craft distiller license and is authorized by this Section to   HB3694- 82 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1sell spirits to non-licensees shall not sell spirits to 2non-licensees from more than 3 total distillery or commonly 3owned distilling pub licensed locations in this State. The 4class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft distiller shall 5designate to the State Commission the distillery or distilling 6pub locations from which it will sell spirits to 7non-licensees. 8    A class 3 craft distiller license shall allow the licensee 9to only (i) manufacture up to 100,000 gallons of spirits per 10year, (ii) make sales of the spirits manufactured on the 11premises or, with the approval of the State Commission, 12spirits manufactured on another class 3 craft distiller 13licensed premises that is wholly owned and operated by the 14same licensee to importing distributors and distributors, to 15retail licensees in accordance with the conditions set forth 16in paragraph (21) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this 17Act, and to non-licensees for use and consumption, (iii) store 18the spirits upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer for sale at 19retail from the licensed premises for off-premises consumption 20no more than 5,000 gallons per year so long as such sales are 21only made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at retail for 22use and consumption on the premises specified in the license 23any form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a licensed 24distributor or importing distributor, and (vi) with the prior 25approval of the State Commission, annually transfer no more 26than 19,375 gallons of spirits manufactured on the premises to   HB3694- 83 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1a licensed class 3 craft distiller wholly owned and operated 2by the same licensee. 3    (f) (Blank).4    (g) Notwithstanding any of the foregoing prohibitions, a 5limited wine manufacturer may sell at retail at its 6manufacturing site for on or off premises consumption and may 7sell to distributors. A limited wine manufacturer licensee 8shall secure liquor liability insurance coverage in an amount 9at least equal to the maximum liability amounts set forth in 10subsection (a) of Section 6-21 of this Act. 11    (h) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 99-47 12shall not diminish or impair the rights of any person, whether 13a distiller, wine manufacturer, agent, or affiliate thereof, 14who requested in writing and submitted documentation to the 15State Commission on or before February 18, 2015 to be approved 16for a retail license pursuant to what has heretofore been 17subsection (f); provided that, on or before that date, the 18State Commission considered the intent of that person to apply 19for the retail license under that subsection and, by recorded 20vote, the State Commission approved a resolution indicating 21that such a license application could be lawfully approved 22upon that person duly filing a formal application for a retail 23license and if that person, within 90 days of the State 24Commission appearance and recorded vote, first filed an 25application with the appropriate local commission, which 26application was subsequently approved by the appropriate local   HB3694- 84 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1commission prior to consideration by the State Commission of 2that person's application for a retail license. It is further 3provided that the State Commission may approve the person's 4application for a retail license or renewals of such license 5if such person continues to diligently adhere to all 6representations made in writing to the State Commission on or 7before February 18, 2015, or thereafter, or in the affidavit 8filed by that person with the State Commission to support the 9issuance of a retail license and to abide by all applicable 10laws and duly adopted rules.11    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 12common ownership of a brewery, winery, or a distillery shall 13not authorize the grant of and aggregation of retail 14privileges granted to any person or licensees in subsection 15(e). Any person or licensee with common ownership in a 16brewery, winery, or a distillery shall be limited to the 17retail privileges granted to only one of the commonly owned 18brewery, winery, or distillery. The State Commission is hereby 19authorized to restrict the locations of any commonly owned 20brewery, winery, or distillery to prevent the expansion of 21retail privileges, including, without limitation, restricting 22a commonly owned brewery, winery, or distillery from operating 23in adjacent licensed premises or restricting self-distribution 24privileges. 25(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 26101-615, eff. 12-20-19; 102-442, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB3694- 85 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    (235 ILCS 5/6-29.05 new)2    Sec. 6-29.05. Distillery shipper's license.3    (a) It is the purpose and intent of this Section:4        (1) to authorize direct shipment of spirits by an 5    out-of-state distiller on the same basis permitted an 6    in-state distiller, an in-state craft distiller, an 7    in-state class 1 craft distiller, an in-state class 2 8    craft distiller, and an in-state class 3 craft distiller 9    pursuant to the authority of the State under the 10    provisions of Section 2 of the Twenty-First Amendment to 11    the United States Constitution and in conformance with the 12    United States Supreme Court decision decided on May 16, 13    2005 in Granholm v. Heald;14        (2) to reaffirm that the General Assembly's findings 15    and declarations that selling alcoholic liquor through 16    various direct marketing means, such as catalogs, 17    newspapers, mailings, and the Internet, directly to 18    consumers of this State poses a serious threat to the 19    State's efforts to further temperance and prevent youth 20    from accessing alcoholic liquor and the expansion of youth 21    access to additional types of alcoholic liquors;22        (3) to maintain the State's broad powers granted by 23    Section 2 of the Twenty-First Amendment to the United 24    States Constitution to control the importation or sale of 25    alcoholic liquor and its right to structure its alcoholic   HB3694- 86 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1    liquor distribution system;2        (4) to ensure that the General Assembly, by 3    authorizing limited direct shipment of spirits to meet the 4    directives of the United States Supreme Court, does not 5    intend to impair or modify the State's distribution of 6    spirits through distributors or importing distributors, 7    but only to permit limited shipment of spirits for 8    personal use; and9        (5) to provide that if a court of competent 10    jurisdiction declares or finds that this Section, which is 11    enacted to conform Illinois law to the United States 12    Supreme Court decision, is invalid or unconstitutional, 13    the Illinois General Assembly at its earliest general 14    session shall conduct hearings and study methods to 15    conform to any directive or order of the court consistent 16    with the temperance and revenue collection purposes of 17    this Act.18    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 19distillery shipper's licensee may ship, for personal use and 20not for resale, not more than 12 cases of spirits per year to 21any resident of this State who is 21 years of age or older.22    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, sale and 23shipment by a distillery shipper's licensee pursuant to this 24Section shall be deemed to constitute a sale in this State.25    (d) The shipping container of any spirit shipped under 26this Section shall be clearly labeled with the following   HB3694- 87 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1words: "CONTAINS ALCOHOL. SIGNATURE OF A PERSON 21 YEARS OF 2AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY. PROOF OF AGE AND IDENTITY 3MUST BE SHOWN BEFORE DELIVERY.". This warning must be 4prominently displayed on the packaging. A licensee shall 5require the transporter or common carrier that delivers the 6spirits to obtain the signature of a person 21 years of age or 7older at the delivery address at the time of delivery. At the 8expense of the licensee, the licensee shall receive a delivery 9confirmation from the express company, common carrier, or 10contract carrier indicating the location of the delivery, time 11of delivery, and the name and signature of the individual 21 12years of age or older who accepts delivery. The State 13Commission may design and create a label or approve a label 14that must be affixed to the shipping container by the 15licensee.16    (e) No broker within this State shall solicit consumers to 17engage in direct spirit shipments under this Section.18    (f) It is not the intent of this Section to impair the 19distribution of spirits through distributors or importing 20distributors, but it is the intent of this Section to only 21permit shipments of spirits for personal use.  HB3694- 88 -LRB104 08047 RPS 18093 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    235 ILCS 5/1-3.47 new4    235 ILCS 5/1-3.48 new5    235 ILCS 5/3-126    235 ILCS 5/5-1from Ch. 43, par. 1157    235 ILCS 5/5-3from Ch. 43, par. 1188    235 ILCS 5/6-4from Ch. 43, par. 1219    235 ILCS 5/6-29.05 new